District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0843.
BE IT ENACTED, BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Events DC Excess Cash Calculation Clarification Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 2. Title II of the Washington Convention Center Authority Act of 1994, effective
September 28, 1994 (D.C. Law 10-188; D.C. Official Code § 10-1202.01 et seq.), is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 208a(b) (D.C. Official Code § 10-1202.08b(b)), is amended by striking the
word “Monies” and inserting the phrase “Except as provided in § 10-1202.13, monies” in its
place.
(b) Section 208b(b)(2) (D.C. Official Code § 10-1202.08b(b)(2)), is amended by striking
the word “All” and inserting the phrase “Except as provided in § 10-1202.13, all” in its place.
(c) Section 213 (D.C. Official Code § 10-1202.13) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) If, at the end of a fiscal year, the balance of cash and investments of the Authority
exceeds the balance of current liabilities (including interest payments that will be due up to 185
days from the end of the fiscal year), reserves, and any amounts that the Authority expects to


apply to purchase or redeem its outstanding indebtedness during the upcoming fiscal year, the
excess shall be transferred, in cash, to the General Fund of the District; provided, that any funds
in the New Convention Center Hotel Fund established by D.C. Code § 10-1221.03, and any
funds transferred to the Authority from Stadium Maintenance Fund established by D.C. Code §
10-1605.10 and/or the Ballpark Preservation and Improvement Fund established by D.C. Code §
10-1601.02a for the Authority to administer on behalf of the District, shall be excluded in all
respects from this calculation.
(2) Subsection (b)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “maximum annual debt
service on outstanding bonds” and inserting the phrase “sum of the maximum annual debt
service for each series of outstanding bonds” in its place.
(3) Subsection (b)(2) is amended by striking the phrase “annual operating
expenditures” and inserting the phrase “budgeted annual operating and marketing expenses for
the upcoming fiscal year” in its place.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
21, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).